Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. United States Congress.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Governor, §§ 5 — 7.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 87, 90, 103.

77 Am. Jur. 2d, United States, §§ 9 — 10.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 1(3), 70 — 74.

91 C.J.S., United States, § 15.

What is “public place” within requirement as to posting of election notices. 90 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 15.40.010.
Conditions and time of filling vacancy by appointment and special election. [Repealed, § 10 ch 50 SLA 2004 and § 7 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4.]

Sec. 15.40.020.
Qualification of appointee. [Repealed, § 1 ch 139 SLA 1967.]

Secs. 15.40.030,
15.40.040.
Conditions for full, unexpired term appointment; conditions for part-term appointment and special election. [Repealed, § 6 ch 30 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 15.40.050 — 15.40.075.
Date of special primary election and special election; proclamation of special election; term of elected senator; determination of candidate; date of nomimations. [Repealed, § 10 ch 50 SLA 2004 and § 7 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4.]

Secs. 15.40.080 — 15.40.120.
Selection of nominees in manner provided for general election; designation of nominees by petition; requirements of petition for no-party candidates and by political parties; selection of political party nominees. [Repealed, § 6 ch 30 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 15.40.130 , 15.40.135.
General provision for conduct of special election; definition. [Repealed, § 10 ch 50 SLA 2004 and § 7 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4.]

Sec. 15.40.140.
Condition of calling special primary election and special election.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator or United States representative, the governor shall, by proclamation, call a special primary election to be held on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days after the date the vacancy occurs, to be followed by a special election on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary election. However, in an election year in which a candidate for that office is not regularly elected, if the vacancy occurs on a date that is not less than 60 days, nor more than 90, before the date of

the primary election, the special primary election shall be held on the date of the primary election with the subsequent special election to be held on the date of the general election; or

the general election, the special primary election shall be held on the date of the general election with the subsequent special election to be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days after the special primary and general election.

History.

(§ 8.21 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 30 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 1 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 2004; am § 30 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 44, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “under AS 15.40.142(a)” for “to be held on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days after the date the vacancy occurs” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States Senator or United States representative, the governor shall, by proclamation, call a special election under AS 15.40.142(a). However, if the vacancy occurs on a date that is less than 60 days before the date of the primary election in the general election year during which a candidate to fill the office is regularly elected, the governor may not call a special election.”

Sec. 15.40.141.
Condition of calling a special runoff election.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.142.
Time of calling the special election and the special runoff election.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.145.
Temporary appointment of United States senator. [See revisor’s note.]

When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator, the governor may, at least five days after the date of the vacancy but within 30 days after the date of the vacancy, appoint a qualified individual to fill the vacancy temporarily until the results of the special election called to fill the vacancy are certified. If a special election is not called for the reasons set out in AS

15.40.140

, the individual shall fill the vacancy temporarily until the results of the next general election are certified.

History.

(§ 3 ch 50 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

The user is cautioned that Ballot Measure No. 4 (Initiative 03-SENV), which was enacted at the 2004 general election and effective March 3, 2005, casts doubt upon the continued effectiveness of this section.
In requiring that Initiative 03-SENV be put on the 2004 general election ballot, Alaska’s Supreme Court stated that AS

15.40.145

, enacted by ch. 50, SLA 2004 “provides that the governor will fill a senate vacancy by appointment, whereas the initiative provides that all vacancies will be filled by popular election,” and also noted that “eliminating gubernatorial appointments from the process of filling senate vacancies is a primary objective of the initiative.”
State of Alaska v. Trust the People Initiative Committee, Supreme Court No. 11288 (Order of August 20, 2004), quoted in full at State v. Trust the People, 113 P.3d 613, 614, n. 1 (Alaska 2005).
Therefore it is possible that the Court may view 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4 as having repealed AS

15.40.145

by implication.

Sec. 15.40.150.
Condition for holding special election with primary.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.160.
Proclamation.

The governor shall issue the proclamation calling the special primary election and special election at least 50 days before the special primary election.

History.

(§ 8.23 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 32 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 45, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, rewrote the section, which read “The governor shall issue the proclamation at least 50 days before the election.”

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “The governor shall issue the proclamation at least 50 days before the (1) special election; and (2) if a special runoff election is required under AS 15.40.141(a), special runoff election.”

Sec. 15.40.165.
Term of elected senator.

At the special election, a United States senator shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. The person elected shall take office on the date the United States Senate meets, convenes, or reconvenes following the certification of the results of the special election by the director.

History.

(§ 2 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4; § 4 ch 50 SLA 2004; am § 33 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 46, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, inserted “or, as provided by AS

15.40.141

, at the special runoff election,” following “special election” in the first sentence; inserted “or special runoff election” following “special election” near the end of the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in the first sentence, deleted “or, as provided by AS

15.40.141

, at the special runoff election,” following “special election,” and in the second sentence, deleted “or special runoff election” following “special election”.

Sec. 15.40.170.
Term of elected representative.

At the special election, a United States representative shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. The person elected shall take office on the date the United States house of representatives meets, convenes, or reconvenes following the certification of the results of the special election by the director.

History.

(§ 8.24 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 163 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 47, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, inserted “or, as provided by AS

15.40.141

, at the special runoff election,” following “special election” in the first sentence; inserted “or special runoff election” following “special election” near the end of the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in the first sentence, deleted “or, as provided by AS

15.40.141

, at the special runoff election,” following “special election,” and in the second sentence, deleted “or special runoff election” following “special election”.

Sec. 15.40.180.
Date of nominations.

Candidates for the special election shall be nominated by petition transmitted by actual physical delivery of the petition in person or by mail postmarked not later than midnight of the filing date.

History.

(§ 8.25 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 164 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 50 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, deleted “; or (3) by telegram or a copy in substance of the statements made in the petition to the director before the 21st day after the vacancy occurs” at the end, and made related changes.

Sec. 15.40.190.
Requirements of petition for candidates.

Petitions for the nomination of candidates must be executed under oath, state in substance that which is required for a declaration of candidacy under AS

15.25.030

, and include the fee required under AS

15.25.050(a)

.

History.

(§ 8.26 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 165 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 35 ch 85 SLA 1986; § 48, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, substituted “must be executed under oath,” for “not representing a political party shall be signed by qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the number of voters who cast ballots in the preceding general election and shall”, and substituted “a declaration of candidacy under AS

15.25.030

, and include the fee required under AS

15.25.050(a)

” for “nomination petitions by AS

15.25.180

”.

Sec. 15.40.200.
Requirements of party petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.210.
Selection of party nominees.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.220.
General provisions for conduct of the special primary election and special election.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the primary election and general election shall govern the conduct of the special primary election and special election of the United States senator or United States representative, including provisions concerning voter qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of municipalities; provision for notification of the election; provision for payment of election expenses; provisions regarding employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the counting, reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of the votes and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and provision for absentee voting.

History.

(§ 8.29 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 2004; am § 35 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 49, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, inserted “and the special runoff election” following “conduct of the special election” and “provision for running as, voting for, and counting ballots for a write-in candidate” following “certification of returns;”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted “conduct of the primary election and general election shall govern the conduct of the special primary election and special election” for “ conduct of the general election shall govern the conduct of the special election and the special runoff election” and deleted “provision for running as, voting for, and counting ballots for a write-in candidate;” following “certification of returns:”.